Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,122
Fire or explosion loss; request for information; subject matter.

The request for information under section 81-5,121 may include, but shall not be limited to:

(1) Pertinent insurance policy information relevant to a fire loss or explosion loss under investigation and any application for such a policy;

(2) Policy premium payment records which are available;

(3) History of previous claims made by the insured; and

(4) Material relating to the investigation of the loss, including statements of any person, proof of loss, and any other evidence relevant to the investigation.

Laws 1979, LB 301, § 8.